Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 6 Revocable Trusts

386B.6-010.
Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 46, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.6-020.
Revocation or amendment of revocable trust.

Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is irrevocable, the settlor may revoke or amend the trust. This subsection shall not apply to a trust created under an instrument signed before July 15, 2014.

If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one (1) settlor:

To the extent the trust consists of community property, the trust may be revoked by either spouse acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses;

To the extent the trust consists of property other than community property, each settlor may revoke or amend the trust with regard the portion of the trust property attributable to that settlor’s contribution; and

On the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all of the settlors, the trustee shall promptly notify the other settlors of the revocation or amendment.

The settlor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:

A later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed according to the terms of the trust; or

Any other method manifesting clear and convincing evidence of the settlor’s intent.

Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee shall deliver the trust property as the settlor directs.

A settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property may be exercised by an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of the trust or the power.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, a conservator of the settlor or, if no conservator has been appointed, a guardian of the settlor or, if neither a conservator nor guardian has been appointed, a curator may exercise a settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property only with the approval of the court supervising the conservatorship, guardianship, or curatorship.

A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable to the settlor or settlor’s successors in interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 47, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.6-030.
Settlor’s powers — Powers of withdrawal.

While a trust is revocable and, in the reasonable belief of the trustee, the settlor has capacity to revoke the trust, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 48, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.6-040.
Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust — Distribution of trust property.

A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death within the earlier of:

Two (2) years after the settlor’s death; or

Ninety (90) days after the trustee sent the person a copy of the trust instrument and a notice informing the person of the trust’s existence, of the trustee’s name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is not subject to liability for doing so unless:

The trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust; or

A potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust and a judicial proceeding is commenced within sixty (60) days after the contestant sent the notification.

A beneficiary of a trust that is determined to have been invalid is liable to return any distribution received.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 49, effective July 15, 2014.